South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3314.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-668. The restoration, exhibition, showing, and enjoyment of classic and antique motor vehicles is the official family-friendly pastime of the State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----